Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 8. Alaska Education Grant Program.

Cross references. —

For a transitional provision relating to the 2014 amendments to this article and regulations, see sec. 47, ch. 89, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 14.43.400.
Purpose; creation.

There is created the Alaska education grant program to provide financial assistance to eligible students to enable them to attend, or continue their attendance at, postsecondary educational institutions. Funds designated by the corporation or appropriated for this program may be used as matching funds for the state’s participation in the federal grant program under 20 U.S.C. 1070c — 1070c-4.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1978; am § 18 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 28 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.930

. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage education grant program, see 20 AAC 16.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, near the beginning of the first sentence substituted “Alaska” for “AlaskAdvantage”.

Sec. 14.43.405.
Administration.

The Alaska education grant program created under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

shall be administered by the executive director of the commission.

[Repealed, § 31 ch 63 SLA 2004.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1978; am § 20 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 33 ch 85 SLA 2001; am §§ 19, 31 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 29 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.935

. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage education grant program, see 20 AAC 16.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (a), substituted “Alaska” for “AlaskAdvantage”.

Sec. 14.43.406.
Applicability of other laws.

To the extent they are not in conflict with the provisions of AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

, the provisions of AS

14.43.162(b)

,

14.43.910

, and

14.43.920

apply to a grant made under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

.

In determining a student’s eligibility for a grant under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

, the executive director of the commission shall apply the standards contained in the definitions of “full-time student,” “half-time student,” and “school year” in AS

14.43.160

as if those provisions were applicable to application for the grant.

History.

(§ 20 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage education grant program, see 20 AAC 16.

Sec. 14.43.410.
Distribution of funds. [Repealed, § 45 ch 89 SLA 2014.]

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 30, ch. 89, SLA 2014 amended former AS

14.43.410

(a). However, sec. 45, ch. 89, SLA 2014 repealed former AS

14.43.410

.
The repeal of former AS 14.43.410 by sec. 45 has been given effect.

Sec. 14.43.415.
Eligibility; priority.

For an applicant to be eligible for a grant under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

, the applicant must be

a resident of this state;

enrolled or about to be enrolled

at an institution located in the state that is

accredited by an institutional accrediting body recognized by the United States Secretary of Education; or

approved to participate in the Alaska performance scholarship program as a qualified postsecondary institution under AS

14.43.830

; and

on at least a half-time basis; and

able to demonstrate financial need in accordance with standards for determining financial need established by the commission.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 89 SLA 2014.]

The commission shall adopt regulations to establish terms and conditions for awarding grants under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

and to establish the amounts to be awarded for on-time, full-time, and half-time student status.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1978; am §§ 21, 22 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 23 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 2012; am §§ 31, 45 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.945

. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage education grant program, see 20 AAC 16.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective April 1, 2013, rewrote (a)(2)(A), which read, “enrolled or about to be enrolled at an institution approved to participate in federal financial aid programs under 20 U.S.C. 1070—1099c-2, as amended, located in this state”; in (a)(3), deleted “under 20 U.S.C. 1070—1099c-2, as amended” at the end.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, repealed (b); in (c), substituted “terms and conditions” for “a prioritization process” following “to establish”, and added “and to establish the amounts to be awarded for on-time, full-time, and half-time student status” at the end.

Sec. 14.43.420.
Limitation on grants.

A grant made under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

may not be in an amount that exceeds $4,000 for each school year.

[Repealed, § 31 ch 63 SLA 2004.]

A student may receive not more than a total of $16,000 in grants awarded under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

.

The commission may apply the amounts awarded under AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

to a state match required by federal grant programs under 20 U.S.C. 1070c-2.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1978; am §§ 24, 25, 31 ch 63 SLA 2004; am §§ 3, 4 ch 14 SLA 2010; am §§ 32 — 34 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.950

. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage education grant program, see 20 AAC 16.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective May 11, 2010, in (a), substituted “$3,000” for “$2,000”; in (c), substituted “$12,000” for “$8,000”.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (a), substituted “an amount that exceeds $4,000” for “an amount less than $500 nor more than $3,000”; in (c), substituted “a total of $16,000” for “a total of $12,000”; added (d).

Sec. 14.43.500.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 31 ch. 63 SLA 2004.]